Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Close supervision" means that a supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist whose patient is being treated has personally diagnosed the condition to be treated and has personally authorized the procedures to be performed. The supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist is continuously on-site and physically present in the treatment facility while the procedures are performed by the assistive personnel and capable of responding immediately in the event of an emergency. The term does not require a supervising dentist or supervising dental therapist to be physically present in the operatory.

(2) "Commission" means the Washington state dental quality assurance commission created in chapter 18.32 RCW.

(3) "Dental assistant" means a person who is registered by the commission to provide supportive services to a licensed dentist or a licensed dental therapist to the extent provided in this chapter and under the close supervision of a dentist or close supervision of a dental therapist.

(4) "Dental therapist" means an individual who holds a license to practice as a dental therapist under chapter 18.265 RCW.

(5) "Dentist" means an individual who holds a license to practice dentistry under chapter 18.32 RCW.

(6) "Department" means the department of health.

(7) "Expanded function dental auxiliary" means a person who is licensed by the commission to provide supportive services to a licensed dentist or dental therapist to the extent provided in this chapter and under the specified level of supervision of a dentist or dental therapist.

(8) "General supervision" means that a supervising dentist or dental therapist has examined and diagnosed the patient and provided subsequent instructions to be performed by the assistive personnel, but does not require that the dentist or dental therapist be physically present in the treatment facility.

(9) "Secretary" means the secretary of health.

(10) "Supervising dental therapist" means a dental therapist licensed under chapter 18.265 RCW who is responsible for providing the appropriate level of supervision for dental assistants and expanded function dental auxiliaries.

(11) "Supervising dentist" means a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW that is responsible for providing the appropriate level of supervision for dental assistants and expanded function dental auxiliaries.

[ 2023 c 460 s 16; 2007 c 269 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.